New Mexico, session 2026, SB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 21 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] DECISIONS REGARDING ACADEMIC TENURE AT STATE INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION.--The boards of regents of state institutions of higher education do not have the power to award, deny, revoke or place conditions on a tenured faculty position. All decisions regarding academic tenure at a state institution of higher education shall be made in accordance with the institution's policies and based on recommendations of the institution's faculty." - 2 -